Wyoming, session 2025, HB0262.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-4-109 is created to read:

18-4-109. County reserves; limitations; refund of
excess reserves.

HB0262

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0419
(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Annual spending amount" means the average
amount of total expenditures for the county in each of the
immediately preceding five (5) fiscal years, excluding
amounts collected through any specific purpose tax that is
approved by the voters of the county;

(ii) "Excess funds" means any funds held by the
county in excess of the annual spending amount.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, no county shall hold
excess funds that exceed the county's annual spending
amount.

(c) Not later than July 1, 2025 and each July 1
thereafter, each county shall:

(i) Calculate the county's annual spending
amount and estimate whether any excess funds will be
available at the end of the fiscal year;

HB0262

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0419
(ii) Report to the department of revenue on the
amount calculated under paragraph (i) of this subsection
and the estimate of excess funds that will be available at
the end of the fiscal year.

(d) Each county with excess funds on July 1, 2025 and
each July 1 thereafter shall:

(i) Report the amount of excess funds to the
department of revenue and the board of county
commissioners;

(ii) Provide notice to residents in accordance
with subsection (e) of this section;

(iii) Refund the excess funds to residents of
the county in accordance with subsection (f) of this
section.

(e) Not later than July 15, 2025 and each July 15
thereafter, each county with excess funds shall provide
notice to persons entitled to receive a refund under this
section.
HB0262

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0419

(f) Not later than August 15, 2025 and each August 15
thereafter, each county shall refund or provide for the
refund of excess funds to owners of record of property in
the county who have been residents of the county for not
less than one (1) year preceding the refund. For purposes
of this subsection, residency shall be determined in
accordance with the rules provided by W.S. 23-1-107. Excess
funds shall be refunded on a pro rata basis.

(g) For each county that does not refund excess funds
in accordance with this section by the date specified in
subsection (f) of this section, the state treasurer shall
withhold from any payment due to a county under W.S.
39-15-111(b) and 39-16-111(b) an amount equal to two (2)
times the amount of excess funds that the county had on
July 1 of the applicable year. The withheld amount shall
be:

(i) Deposited and held in the legislative
stabilization reserve account until the date specified in
paragraph (ii) of this section;

HB0262

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0419
(ii) Transferred from the legislative
stabilization reserve account to the county upon the county
certifying to the state treasurer and the department of
revenue that the county has refunded the excess funds in
accordance with this section.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0262